District of Columbia statutes.
2-1137

Indemnification.

(a)

Any liability incurred by the Regional Authority, not covered by insurance under § 2-1136(c)(4)(C), shall be further indemnified by the Signatories, in proportion to the relative economic benefit currently expected to accrue to each Signatory from hosting the Olympic Games, as follows:

(1)

The State of Maryland shall be liable for 53%;

(2)

The Commonwealth of Virginia shall be liable for 19%; and

(3)

The District of Columbia shall be liable for 28%.

(b)

Each of the Signatories may provide for its share of any possible liability in any manner it may choose, as befits each Signatory’s independent commitment.

History

Feb. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-63, § 8, 48 DCR 10549

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1136.